District of Columbia statutes.
1-811.06

Termination of Federal Supplemental Fund.

Effective upon the transfer of the assets of the Federal Supplemental Fund to the D.C. Federal Pension Fund under § 1-817.03:

(1)

The Federal Supplemental Fund shall terminate; and

(2)

Any duty imposed on any person with respect to the Federal Supplemental fund shall terminate.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 724, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11056
as added Dec. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 3969, Pub. L. 108-489, § 2(b)(2)

History